Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.195

Academic acceleration for high school students—Adoption of policy.

(1) By the 2021-22 school year, each school district board of directors shall adopt an academic acceleration policy for high school students as provided under this section.

(2) Under an academic acceleration policy:

(a) The district shall automatically enroll any student who meets or exceeds the state standard on the eighth grade or high school English language arts or mathematics statewide student assessment in the next most rigorous level of advanced courses or program offered by the high school that aligns with the student's high school and beyond plan goals.

(b) Each school district may include additional eligibility criteria for students to participate in the academic acceleration policy so long as the district criteria does not create inequities among student groups in the advanced course or program.

(3)(a) The subject matter of the advanced courses or program in which a student is automatically enrolled depends on the content area or areas of the assessments where the student has met or exceeded the state standard under subsection (2) of this section.

(b) Students who meet or exceed the state standard on the English language arts statewide student assessment are eligible for enrollment in advanced courses in English, social studies, humanities, and other related subjects.

(c) Students who meet or exceed the state standard on the mathematics statewide student assessment are eligible for enrollment in advanced courses in mathematics.

(d) Beginning in the 2021-22 school year, students who meet or exceed the state standard on the Washington comprehensive assessment of science are eligible for enrollment in advanced courses in science.

(4)(a) Students who successfully complete an advanced course in accordance with subsection (3) of this section are then enrolled in the next most rigorous level of advanced course that aligns with the student's high school and beyond plan.

(b) Students who successfully complete the advanced course in accordance with this subsection are then enrolled in the next most rigorous level of advanced course with the objective that students will eventually be automatically enrolled in courses that offer the opportunity to earn dual credit for high school and college.

(5) The district must notify students and parents or guardians regarding the academic acceleration policy and the advanced courses or programs available to students, including dual credit courses or programs.

(6) The district must provide a parent or guardian of a high school student with an opportunity to opt the student out of the academic acceleration policy and enroll the student in an alternative course or program that aligns with the student's high school and beyond plan goals.

[ 2019 c 252 s 502; 2013 c 184 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Findings—2013 c 184: "(1) The legislature finds that progress is being made in making dual high school and college credit courses available for students:

(a) Overall dual credit program enrollments increased by almost four percent between 2009 and 2012;

(b) The number of dual credit programs offered by Washington high schools increased by almost fifteen percent between the 2009-10 school year and the 2011-12 school year; and

(c) Dual credit program participation rates for low-income students increased more than fourteen percent between the 2009-10 school year and the 2011-12 school year.

(2) However, the legislature further finds that more can be done to promote academic acceleration for all students and eliminate barriers, real or perceived, that may prevent students from enrolling in rigorous advanced courses, including dual credit courses." [ 2013 c 184 s 1.]